Utah statutes.
63L-2-201.   Federal government acquisition of real property in the state.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Agency" is defined in Section 63G-10-102.

(b)  "Agency" includes:

(i)  the School and Institutional Trust Lands Administration created in Section 53C-1-201; and

(ii)  the School and Institutional Trust Lands Board of Trustees created in Section 53C-1-202.

(2) (a)  Before legally binding the state by executing an agreement to sell or transfer to the United States government 10,000 or more acres of any state lands or school and institutional trust lands, an agency shall submit the agreement or proposal:

(i)  to the Legislature for its approval or rejection; or

(ii)  in the interim, to the Legislative Management Committee for review of the agreement or proposal.

(b)  The Legislative Management Committee may:

(i)  recommend that the agency execute the agreement or proposal;

(ii)  recommend that the agency reject the agreement or proposal; or

(iii)  recommend to the governor that the governor call a special session of the Legislature to review and approve or reject the agreement or proposal.

(3)  Before legally binding the state by executing an agreement to sell or transfer to the United States government less than 10,000 acres of any state lands or school and institutional trust lands, an agency shall notify the Natural Resources, Agriculture, and Environment Interim Committee.

(4)  Notwithstanding Subsections (2) and (3), the Legislature approves all conveyances of school trust lands to the United States government made for the purpose of completing the Red Cliffs Desert Reserve in Washington County.



Amended by Chapter 247, 2011 General Session

